Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB191.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 1205.4 and 1423 of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, are repealed:[Section 1205.4. CPR Instruction.--(a) School entities shall be required to offer a cardiopulmonary resuscitation training (CPR) class on school premises at least once every three years. The course shall be offered as an option to all 1234567891011121314151617181920 employes of the school entity.(b) Completion of training, including testing of skills and knowledge, shall be documented by the signature and title of a representative of the training entity and shall include the date training was completed. Documentation shall be retained in the facility in that employe's file. Training shall be conducted by:(1) the American Red Cross;(2) the American Heart Association;(3) an individual certified to conduct CPR training by the American Red Cross, American Heart Association or other certifying agency approved by the Department of Health; or(4) other certifying agency approved by the Department of Health.(c) School districts may include this training in the continuing education plan submitted by the district to the Department of Education under section 1205.1.(d) For purposes of this section, a school entity shall be defined as a local school district, intermediate unit or area career and technical school.Section 1423. Automatic External Defibrillators.--(a) The department shall establish an automatic external defibrillator program to assist school entities and nonpublic schools in making automatic external defibrillators available in school buildings.(b) On a biennial basis, the department, in consultation with the Department of General Services and the Department of Health, shall issue an invitation to bid for the cost of automatic external defibrillators and other equipment and supplies necessary for the proper operation of the device. The department shall accept the bid of the lowest responsible bidder 20250HB0191PN1646 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and permit any school entity or nonpublic school to purchase the devices at the contract bid price. The department may purchase automatic external defibrillators from any funds appropriated pursuant to subsection (k) for distribution to school entities and nonpublic schools.(c) To be eligible to obtain or purchase automatic external defibrillators under the program a school entity or nonpublic school must:(1) Assure that two (2) or more persons assigned to the location where the automatic external defibrillator will be primarily housed are trained as required in subsection (d).(2) Ensure that the device will be secured in a safe and readily accessible location and agree to properly maintain and test the device according to the manufacturer's operational guidelines.(3) Submit a valid prescription for the device from a licensed medical practitioner in this Commonwealth.(4) Agree to provide the training required by subsection (d).(d) School personnel who are expected to use the automatic external defibrillator shall complete training in cardiopulmonary resuscitation and in the use of an automatic external defibrillator provided by the American Heart Association, the American Red Cross or through an equivalent course of instruction approved by the Department of Health.(e) A school entity may include the training required by subsection (d) in its continuing professional education plan submitted to the department under section 1205.1.(f) The provisions of 42 Pa.C.S. § 8331.2 (relating to good Samaritan civil immunity for use of automated external 20250HB0191PN1646 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 defibrillator) shall apply to school employes who render care with an automatic external defibrillator.(g) From funds appropriated for this purpose, the department may assist school entities and nonpublic schools that are not equipped with automatic external defibrillators by providing a discount from the contract bid price obtained under subsection (b) or by providing automatic external defibrillators obtained under subsection (b).(g.1) The purchase of an automatic external defibrillator shall be considered an allowable use of Pennsylvania Accountability Grants under section 2599.2(b).(g.2) The purchase of automatic external defibrillators shall be considered an innovative educational program under Article XVII-F of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the "Tax Reform Code of 1971."(h) (Reserved).(i) Not later than June 30, 2014, and each year thereafter, each school entity shall make a report to the department detailing the number, condition, age and placement of automatic external defibrillators in each school building. After the initial report is made, a school entity may report this information as part of the annual report required by the Commonwealth under section 2505.1 to receive State reimbursement for health services.(i.1) A nonpublic school that participates in the automatic external defibrillator program under subsection (b) or (g) shall be subject to the reporting required under subsection (i).(i.2) The department shall annually publish a report on its publicly accessible Internet website no later than December 31, 2014, and each year thereafter. The report shall contain the 20250HB0191PN1646 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 following information:(1) The total number of automatic external defibrillators by school entity and nonpublic school.(2) The number of school buildings by school entity and nonpublic school that are equipped with automatic external defibrillators.(3) The number of school buildings by school entity and nonpublic school that are not equipped with automatic external defibrillators.(j) The department may adopt guidelines as necessary to administer this section.(k) The General Assembly may appropriate funds to carry out the provisions of this section.(l) As used in this section--"Automatic external defibrillator" means a portable device that uses electric shock to restore a stable heart rhythm to an individual in cardiac arrest."Department" means the Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Nonpublic school" means a nonprofit school, other than a public school within this Commonwealth, wherein a resident of this Commonwealth may legally fulfill the compulsory school attendance requirements of this act and which meets the applicable requirements of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 (Public Law 88-352, 78 Stat. 241)."School building" means a building owned by or under the control of a school entity or nonpublic school where classes are taught or extracurricular activities are conducted on a regular basis."School entity" means an area career and technical school, a 20250HB0191PN1646 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 charter school, a cyber charter school, an intermediate unit or a school district."Secretary" means the Secretary of Education of the Commonwealth.]Section 2. The act is amended by adding sections to read:Section 1423.1. AED and CPR Instruction and Procedure.--(a) Each school entity AND NONPUBLIC SCHOOL shall make available to the school entity's employes and volunteers instruction in the principles and techniques of cardiopulmonary resuscitation and the use of an automated external defibrillator on school premises at least once every two years, to which the following shall apply:(1) The instruction shall be offered as an option to all school entity employes and volunteers.(2) The instruction shall be conducted by any of the following:(i) The American Red Cross.(ii) The American Heart Association.(iii) An individual certified to conduct CPR training by the American Red Cross, American Heart Association or other certifying agency approved by the Department of Health.(iv) Another certifying agency approved by the Department of Health.(3) A school entity , OR nonpublic school or private school , as applicable, may provide the instruction under this section through the Internet or other electronic means.(b) The following apply to AED and CPR instruction:(1) Each school entity shall ensure that at least one (1) individual trained and certified in the use of an AED and CPR is present in each school building during each school day.20250HB0191PN1646 - 6 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Each school nurse or designee, coach of an athletic activity, marching band director, physical education teacher, athletic trainer and athletic training student aide within each school entity must participate in the instruction in the use of an AED and CPR.(3) An individual described in this subsection must complete the instruction and maintain certification in the use of an AED in accordance with this section.(c) The following apply to continuing education requirements:(1) A school entity may include the instruction under this section in the continuing education plan submitted by the district to the department under section 1205.1.(2) Satisfying the instruction requirements of this section shall also satisfy the training requirements under section 1425(d).(d) Completion of instruction under subsections (a) and (b), including the testing of skills and knowledge, shall be documented by the signature and title of a representative of the training entity and shall include the date that the instruction was completed. The documentation shall be retained by the school entity in the file of the employe or volunteer that completed the training.(e) The following apply to a cardiac emergency response plan:(1) Each school entity , OR nonpublic school or private school shall develop or amend an existing cardiac emergency response plan for schools and school athletic activities that includes:(i) Nationally recognized evidence-based core elements or 20250HB0191PN1646 - 7 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 standards.(ii) An annual review.(iii) Safety procedures to follow in response to a medical emergency involving cardiac arrest and the use of an AED.(iv) The placement of AEDs on school premises.(2) The cardiac emergency response plan of each school entity , OR nonpublic school or private school shall: (i) Make available cardiac awareness information to school employes and those responsible for extracurricular activities of the school entity.(ii) Require conducting annual sudden cardiac arrest drills with or without the participation of students to test the cardiac emergency response plan in response to a sudden cardiac arrest.(f) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Athletic activity" means as defined in section 1425(h)."Automated external defibrillator" or "AED" means a portable device that uses electric shock to restore a stable heart rhythm to an individual in cardiac arrest."CPR" means cardiopulmonary resuscitation."Department" means the Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Nonpublic school" means a nonprofit school, other than a public school within this Commonwealth, wherein a resident of this Commonwealth may legally fulfill the compulsory school attendance requirements of this act and which meets the applicable requirements of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 (Public Law 88-352, 78 Stat. 241).20250HB0191PN1646 - 8 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Private school" means a school licensed under the act of December 15, 1986 (P.L.1585, No.174), known as the Private Licensed Schools Act."School building" means a building owned by or under the control of a school entity , OR nonpublic school or private school where classes are taught or extracurricular activities are conducted on a regular basis."School day" means the length of time that a child subject to compulsory school attendance is expected to be receiving instruction during a calendar day as determined by the governing body."School entity" means a school district, charter school, regional charter school, cyber charter school, intermediate unit or area career and technical school."Volunteer" means an individual who holds an unpaid position with a school entity as a volunteer for a program, activity or service and is responsible for the welfare of children or has direct volunteer contact.Section 1423.2. Automated External Defibrillator Program.-- (a) The department shall establish the Automated External Defibrillator Program to assist school entities , AND nonpublic schools and private schools in making AEDs available in school buildings.(b) On a biennial basis, the department, in consultation with the Department of General Services and the Department of Health, shall issue an invitation to bid for the cost of AEDs and other equipment and supplies necessary for the proper operation of the device. The department shall accept the bid of the lowest responsible bidder and permit any school entity , OR nonpublic school or private school to purchase the devices at 20250HB0191PN1646 - 9 - <--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the contract bid price. The department may purchase AEDs from any money appropriated in accordance with subsection (k) for distribution to school entities , OR nonpublic schools or private schools . (c) To be eligible to obtain or purchase AEDs under the program, a school entity , OR nonpublic school or private school must:(1) Comply with the provisions of section 1423.1.(2) Ensure that the AED will be secured in a safe and readily accessible location and agree to properly maintain and test the device according to the manufacturer's operational guidelines.(3) Submit a valid prescription for the device from a licensed medical practitioner in this Commonwealth.(d) The provisions of 42 Pa.C.S. § 8331.2 (relating to good Samaritan civil immunity for use of automated external defibrillator) shall apply to school entity , OR nonpublic school or private school employes who render care with an AED. (e) From money appropriated for the purposes under this section, the department may assist school entities , AND nonpublic schools and private schools that are not equipped with AEDs by providing a discount from the contract bid price obtained under subsection (b) or by providing AEDs obtained under subsection (b).(f) The purchase of AEDs shall be considered an allowable use of Pennsylvania Accountability Grants under section 2599.2(b).(g) The purchase of AEDs shall be considered an innovative educational program under Article XX-B.(h) The purchase of AEDs shall be considered an eligible 20250HB0191PN1646 - 10 - <--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 school safety and security expense in section 1306-B(j).(i) The department may accept donations, including donations of equipment, for use in providing CPR and AED instruction to students, employes and volunteers at school entities , AND nonpublic schools and private schools . The following apply: (1) The department shall geographically distribute any donations to school entities , AND nonpublic schools and private schools for the purpose of CPR and AED instruction under section 1423.1.(2) A school entity , OR nonpublic school or private school may accept from the department donations received under this subsection for use in providing instruction to students, school employes and volunteers in the principles and techniques of CPR and operating an AED. A school entity , OR nonpublic school or private school may accept other donations, including donations of equipment, for use in providing the instruction.(3) To the extent that resources are available to a school entity , OR nonpublic school or private school under this section, the school entity , OR nonpublic school or private school may make available instruction to students in the principles and techniques of CPR and operating an AED.(4) A school entity , OR nonpublic school or private school may use resources other than those made available under this section to make available instruction to students, school employes and volunteers in the principles and techniques of CPR and operating an AED.(j) The department may adopt guidelines as necessary to administer this section.(k) The General Assembly may appropriate money to carry out the provisions of this section.20250HB0191PN1646 - 11 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (l) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Automated external defibrillator" or "AED" means as defined in section 1423.1."CPR" means cardiopulmonary resuscitation."Department" means as defined in section 1423.1."Nonpublic school" means as defined in section 1423.1."Private school" means as defined in section 1423.1."Program" means the Automated External Defibrillator Program established under this section."S chool building" means a building owned by or under the control of a school entity , OR nonpublic school or private school where classes are taught or extracurricular activities are conducted on a regular basis. "School entity" means as defined in section 1423.1.Section 1423.3. Availability and Specifications of Automated External Defibrillators.--(a) Each school entity , AND nonpublic school and private school shall have at least one automated external defibrillator in each school building of the school entity , OR nonpublic school or private school at all times during the school day.(b) Each school entity , OR nonpublic school or private school shall make available an AED and at least one employe of the school entity , OR nonpublic school or private school who is trained and certified under section 1423.1 at each athletic activity. The presence of emergency services personnel shall fulfill this requirement.(c) The Department of Education, in consultation with the Pennsylvania Interscholastic Athletic Association, shall develop 20250HB0191PN1646 - 12 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 guidelines for the availability of AEDs at athletic activities which shall specify that an AED need not be physically present in the immediate vicinity of every ongoing athletic activity, but must be readily available and accessible at the location of the athletic activity.(d) This section does not:(1) waive any liability or immunity of a school entity , OR nonpublic school or private school or its officers or employes; or(2) create any liability for or a cause of action against a school entity , OR nonpublic school or private school or its officers or employes.(e) The provisions of 42 Pa.C.S. § 8331.2 (relating to good Samaritan civil immunity for use of automated external defibrillator) shall apply to school entity , OR nonpublic school or private school employes who render care with an AED. (f) Each school entity , AND nonpublic school and private school shall ensure that each AED on the premises of the school entity , OR nonpublic school or private school is properly tested and maintained in accordance with the manufacturer's operational guidelines. Each AED in a school entity , OR nonpublic school or private school shall meet the most recent minimum specifications as required by the Department of Health.(g) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Athletic activity" means as defined in section 1425(h)."Automated external defibrillator" or "AED" means as defined in section 1423.1."Emergency services personnel" means any of the following:20250HB0191PN1646 - 13 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) An emergency medical responder.(2) An emergency medical technician.(3) An advanced emergency medical technician.(4) A paramedic.(5) A prehospital registered nurse.(6) A prehospital physician extender.(7) A prehospital emergency medical services physician.(8) An individual prescribed by regulations of the Department of Health to provide specialized emergency medical services."Nonpublic school" means as defined in section 1423.1."Private school" means as defined in section 1423.1." School building " means as defined in section 1423.1. " School day " means as defined in section 1423.1. "School entity" means as defined in section 1423.1.Section 3. School entities, AND nonpublic schools and private schools shall comply with the addition of sections 1423.1, 1423.2 and 1423.3 of the act no later than three years after the effective date of this section.Section 4. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0191PN1646 - 14 - <--<--1234567891011121314151617181920